src-fst-morphology-stems-nouns.lexc.md
# Pite Saami Nouns

* **LEXICON Noun   ** is the main lexicon

## Lexc inflectional classes (Mini-grammar)

* Even-syllable stem patterns: 
- N_EVEN: bisyllabic stems except those ending in -o- (e.g. juällge, bijjla, gisstá, gällu, båsskå) 
- N_EVEN_O: bisyllabic stems ending in -o- (e.g. iello)
- N_EVEN4: tetrasyllabic stems (trisyllabic in Nom.Sg) ending in -k/-g-, -tj- (e.g. mánnodak, såbmelatj)
- N_EVEN4_ISA: tetrasyllabic stems (trisyllabic in Nom.Sg) ending in -is/-as- (e.g. guoksagis)
* Odd-syllable stem patterns:  
- N_ODD: odd-syllable stems ending in a closed syllable and without consonant gradation (e.g. almatj) 
- N_ODD_OPEN: odd-syllable stems ending in an open syllable (e.g. biena) 
- N_ODD_VH: odd-syllable stems ending in a closed syllable and with vowel harmony (e.g. ålol) 
- N_ODD_WG: odd-syllable stems ending in a closed syllable (e.g. vanas)
* Contracted stem patterns: 
- N_CONTR_AJA: contracted stems ending in -aj or -a (e.g. ålmaj) 
- N_CONTR_ESA: contracted stems ending in -es or -á (e.g. sarves) 
- N_CONTR_OJU: contracted stems ending in -oj or -u (e.g. båtsoj) 
- N_CONTR_OU: contracted stems ending in -o or -u (e.g. suolo)

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sje/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
